Illinois, session 104th, HB5141.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.71 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new)7    Sec. 5-45.71. Emergency rulemaking; awards show wagering. 8To provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of 9changes made to the Sports Wagering Act by this amendatory Act 10of the 104th General Assembly, emergency rules implementing 11the changes made to the Sports Wagering Act by this amendatory 12Act of the 104th General Assembly may be adopted in accordance 13with Section 5-45 by the Illinois Gaming Board. The adoption 14of emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section 15is deemed to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 16welfare.17    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 18of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 19    Section 10. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by changing 20Section 25-10 and by adding Section 25-66 as follows: 21    (230 ILCS 45/25-10)  HB5141- 2 -LRB104 19805 LNS 33255 b1    Sec. 25-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:2    "Adjusted gross sports wagering receipts" means a master 3sports wagering licensee's gross sports wagering receipts, 4less winnings paid to wagerers in such games.5    "Athlete" means any current or former professional athlete 6or collegiate athlete.7    "Awards show" means the Emmy Awards Show, the Grammy 8Awards Show, the Academy Awards Show, the Tony Awards Show, or 9any other live competition or talent contest. 10    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.11    "Covered persons" includes athletes; umpires, referees, 12and officials; personnel associated with clubs, teams, 13leagues, and athletic associations; medical professionals 14(including athletic trainers) who provide services to athletes 15and players; and the family members and associates of these 16persons where required to serve the purposes of this Act.17    "Department" means the Department of the Lottery.18    "Gaming facility" means a facility at which gambling 19operations are conducted under the Illinois Gambling Act, 20pari-mutuel wagering is conducted under the Illinois Horse 21Racing Act of 1975, or sports wagering is conducted under this 22Act.23    "Official league data" means statistics, results, 24outcomes, and other data related to a sports event obtained 25pursuant to an agreement with the relevant sports governing 26body, or an entity expressly authorized by the sports   HB5141- 3 -LRB104 19805 LNS 33255 b1governing body to provide such information to licensees, that 2authorizes the use of such data for determining the outcome of 3tier 2 sports wagers on such sports events.4    "Organization licensee" has the meaning given to that term 5in the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975.6    "Owners licensee" means the holder of an owners license 7under the Illinois Gambling Act.8    "Person" means an individual, partnership, committee, 9association, corporation, or any other organization or group 10of persons.11    "Personal biometric data" means an athlete's information 12derived from DNA, heart rate, blood pressure, perspiration 13rate, internal or external body temperature, hormone levels, 14glucose levels, hydration levels, vitamin levels, bone 15density, muscle density, and sleep patterns.16    "Prohibited conduct" includes any statement, action, and 17other communication intended to influence, manipulate, or 18control a betting outcome of a sporting contest or of any 19individual occurrence or performance in a sporting contest in 20exchange for financial gain or to avoid financial or physical 21harm. "Prohibited conduct" includes statements, actions, and 22communications made to a covered person by a third party, such 23as a family member or through social media. "Prohibited 24conduct" does not include statements, actions, or 25communications made or sanctioned by a team or sports 26governing body.  HB5141- 4 -LRB104 19805 LNS 33255 b1    "Qualified applicant" means an applicant for a license 2under this Act whose application meets the mandatory minimum 3qualification criteria as required by the Board.4    "Sporting contest" means a sports event or game on which 5the State allows sports wagering to occur under this Act. 6    "Sports event" means a professional sport or athletic 7event, a collegiate sport or athletic event, a motor race 8event, or any other event or competition of relative skill 9authorized by the Board under this Act. "Sports event" 10includes, unless the context requires otherwise, any awards 11show. 12    "Sports facility" means a facility that hosts sports 13events and holds a seating capacity greater than 17,000 14persons, except in a municipality with a population of more 15than 1,000,000, a seating capacity greater than 10,000 16persons.17    "Sports governing body" means the organization that 18prescribes final rules and enforces codes of conduct with 19respect to a sports event and participants therein. 20    "Sports wagering" means accepting wagers on sports events 21or portions of sports events, or on the individual performance 22statistics of athletes or other participants in a sports event 23or combination of sports events, by any system or method of 24wagering, including, but not limited to, in person or over the 25Internet through websites and on mobile devices. "Sports 26wagering" includes, but is not limited to, single-game bets,   HB5141- 5 -LRB104 19805 LNS 33255 b1teaser bets, parlays, over-under, moneyline, pools, exchange 2wagering, in-game wagering, in-play bets, proposition bets, 3and straight bets. 4    "Sports wagering account" means a financial record 5established by a master sports wagering licensee for an 6individual patron in which the patron may deposit and withdraw 7funds for sports wagering and other authorized purchases and 8to which the master sports wagering licensee may credit 9winnings or other amounts due to that patron or authorized by 10that patron.11    "Tier 1 sports wager" means a sports wager that is 12determined solely by the final score or final outcome of the 13sports event and is placed before the sports event has begun. 14    "Tier 2 sports wager" means a sports wager that is not a 15tier 1 sports wager.16    "Wager" means a sum of money or thing of value risked on an 17uncertain occurrence.18    "Winning bidder" means a qualified applicant for a master 19sports wagering license chosen through the competitive 20selection process under Section 25-45.21(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 22    (230 ILCS 45/25-66 new)23    Sec. 25-66. Awards show wagering.24    (a) The Board shall, within 6 months after the effective 25date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly,   HB5141- 6 -LRB104 19805 LNS 33255 b1adopt rules that permit wagering on awards shows pursuant to 2Section 25-20.3    (b) Rules proposed by the Board may be adopted as 4emergency rules pursuant to Section 5-45 of the Illinois 5Administrative Procedure Act.  6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.